Tennessee, session 114, SB0021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Educational institution" means:
(A) A public school operated by an LEA or this state, or pursuant
to a charter agreement, that provides education to students in the twelfth
grade or below; or
(B) A public postsecondary institution that provides education to
students at a level above the twelfth grade;
(2) "Governmental entity":
(A) Means any branch, department, agency, commission or
instrumentality of state government, any official or other person acting
under color of state law, or any political subdivision of this state; and
(B) Includes an educational institution; and
(3) "International policymaking organization":
(A) Means a non-governmental entity that issues model policies
or guidelines or proposed laws or rules that pertain to a particular subject
matter or range of subject matter areas of public policy and which may be
SB0021
000048
- 1 -

adopted in whole or in part by an instrument of government as the policy
of that governing body; and
(B) Includes, but is not limited to, the World Health Organization,
the United Nations, and the World Economic Forum.
(b)
(1) An international policymaking organization has no jurisdiction or
authority within this state or a political subdivision of this state.
(2) A law passed by the United States congress or a rule promulgated by
a political subdivision of the federal government of the United States that is
based in whole or in part on a policy or guideline of, or a proposed law or rule
issued by, an international policymaking organization has no jurisdiction or
authority within this state or a political subdivision of this state, and a person
acting on behalf of a governmental entity shall not enforce or attempt to enforce
such law or rule within this state.
(3) A governmental entity shall not adopt, enact, implement, enforce, or
attempt to enforce a policy or guideline of, or a proposed law or rule issued by,
an international policymaking organization unless the governmental entity is
authorized to do so by state law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000048